District of Columbia statutes.
47-2602

Domicile of insurer organized in foreign country.

Except for insurers organized under the laws of Canada, the domicile of an insurer organized or formally located in a foreign country shall be the insurer’s principal place of business in the United States of America. The domicile of a Canadian insurer shall be the Canadian province where the insurer’s headquarters are located.

Aug. 17, 1937, ch. 690, title II, § 2
as added Sept. 26, 1984, D.C. Law 5-113, § 401, 31 DCR 3974
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 453, 32 DCR 4450
Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-237, § 2(t), 38 DCR 314
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-2602.
Mayor authorized to issue rules: See notes to § 47-2601.